Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1733
Acquisition agent; sales agent; maintain records.

The acquisition agent and sales agent shall each maintain their respective records of any independent contractors employed by them, their addresses, and commissions paid for the immediately preceding two calendar years.

Laws 1980, LB 945, § 33.